Arkansas, session 2025, HB1917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 4-75-1303 — 4-75-1305 are amended to read
as follows:
4-75-1303. Right to compensation.
(a) Except as prohibited in this subchapter, a student-athlete shall
have the right to enter into a contract and receive compensation for the
commercial use of the student-athlete's publicity rights.
(b) An institution of higher education, its supporting foundations, or
its authorized entities may identify:
(1) Identify, create, facilitate, and otherwise enable
opportunities for a student-athlete to earn compensation for the commercial
use of the student-athlete's publicity rights;
(2) Compensate a student-athlete for the commercial use of the
student-athlete's publicity rights; and
(3) Enter into an exclusive or nonexclusive license agreement
with a student-athlete for the commercial use of the student-athlete's
publicity rights.
*CRH247*
03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247

HB1917
(c)(1) A charitable organization that qualifies as an exempt
organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2023,
shall have the right to compensate student-athletes for the commercial use of
the student-athlete's publicity rights.
(d) Except as provided in this subchapter or applicable federal law,
an institution of higher education shall not uphold any rule, requirement,
standard, or other limitation of an athletic association or athletic
conference that prevents a student-athlete from earning compensation for the
commercial use of the student-athlete's publicity rights An institution of
higher education in this state may revoke or rescind an agreement or
commitment to provide compensation, a grant-in-aid, or other benefit to a
student-athlete who receives or agrees to receive compensation that conflicts
with a term or condition of a contract, policy, rule, regulation, or standard
of the student-athlete's committed or enrolled institution of higher
education.
(2) The institution of higher education and officers, agents,
and employees of the institution of higher education shall not be liable for
damages or be subjected to any injunctive relief by a court as a consequence
of the revocation or rescission of an agreement under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section.
(e) Earning compensation for the commercial use of a student-athlete's
publicity rights shall not affect the student-athlete's scholarship
eligibility.
(f)(d) An athletic association, athletic conference, or any other
organization with authority over varsity intercollegiate athletics shall not:
(1) Prevent a student-athlete from receiving compensation for
the commercial use of the student-athlete's publicity rights under this
subchapter;
(2) Penalize a student-athlete for receiving compensation for
the commercial use of the student-athlete's publicity rights under this
subchapter unless expressly agreed by an institution of higher education as a
condition of athletic association or conference membership or as otherwise
provided by applicable federal law; or
(3) Prevent an institution of higher education from
participating in varsity intercollegiate athletics, or otherwise penalize an
institution of higher education, as a result of a student-athlete's receipt
03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247

HB1917
of compensation under this subchapter unless expressly agreed by an
institution of higher education as a condition of athletic association or
conference membership or as otherwise provided by applicable federal law.
(e) Income received by a student-athlete from an institution of higher
education as compensation for the use of his or her name, image, or likeness
or as a percentage of institutional athletic revenue permitted by the
institution of higher education's governing athletic association or
conference under this subchapter is exempt from state income tax.
(f) Personal or financial information of a student-athlete contained
in an agreement authorized under this subchapter is confidential and not
subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-
101 et seq.

4-75-1304. Conflicts.
(a) A third-party licensee or student-athlete shall not enter into a
contract for the commercial use of the student-athlete's publicity rights if
the contract:
(1) Requires the student-athlete to endorse, use, solicit, sell,
market, advertise, promote, refer to, mention, display, or otherwise promote
the name, image, logo, product, service, purpose, campaign, business, digital
or physical address, or location of any third-party licensee or commercial
entity during a varsity intercollegiate athletic practice, competition, or
other activity without the written authorization from the student-athlete's
committed or enrolled institution of higher education;
(2) Conflicts with a term or condition of a contract, policy,
rule, regulation, or standard of the student-athlete's committed or enrolled
institution of higher education; or
(3) Involves the student-athlete's performance or lack of
performance in athletic competition without the written authorization from
the student-athlete's committed or enrolled institution of higher education.
(b) A contract in violation of this subchapter is void and
unenforceable.

4-75-1305. Representation.
(a) An agent, athlete agent, financial advisor, or attorney who is
providing professional representation of a student-athlete shall be licensed,
03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247

HB1917
as applicable, in this state.
(b) An institution of higher education, athletic association, athletic
conference, or other organization with authority over varsity intercollegiate
athletics shall not prevent a student-athlete from participating in a varsity
intercollegiate sport, or otherwise penalize a student-athlete, for obtaining
professional representation in connection with an opportunity to earn
compensation for the commercial use of the student-athlete's publicity
rights.
(c) A student-athlete may rescind a publicity rights contract with a
third-party licensee or a contract for professional representation related to
publicity rights without being held liable for breach of contract and with no
obligation to return payments received before giving notice of rescission if
the student-athlete:
(1) Student-athlete is no longer eligible to participate in any
varsity intercollegiate athletics program at an institution of higher
education; or
(2) Individual providing professional representation is not
licensed in this state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1307(a)(5), concerning that the
Arkansas Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act does not render a student-
athlete an employee of the institution of higher education, is amended to
read as follows:
(5)(A) Render student-athletes employees of the institution of
higher education based on participation in varsity intercollegiate athletic
competition.
(B) A student-athlete has not been and shall not be
considered an employee of an institution of higher education, a conference,
or an association for purposes of or as a basis for imposing liability or
awarding damages or other monetary relief under any state law based on the
student-athlete's receipt of compensation or of any payments or benefits,
other than payment of hourly wages and benefits for work actually performed
and not for participation in intercollegiate athletics, at a rate
commensurate with the applicable rate in the locality of the institution of
higher education for similar work or any of the following:
(i) Participation in intercollegiate athletic
03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247

HB1917
competition;
(ii) Membership on any varsity sports team; or
(iii) Imposition of requirements, controls or
restrictions on student-athletes by institutions of higher education, in
connection with participation in intercollegiate athletic activities,
practices, and competition.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1307, concerning the scope of
the Arkansas Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of state law to the contrary, the
release of or license to use purported name, image, and likeness rights or a
name, image, and likeness agreement shall not be required from or with any
individual or group of participants in a sports game, contest, or event or
spectators at a sports game, contest, or event for audiovisual, audio, or
visual broadcasts, rebroadcasts, or other distributions of the sports game,
contest, or event.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1308(d), concerning liability under
the Arkansas Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) An institution of higher education, located within this state or
its employees, a supporting foundation or authorized entity, an athletic
association, a conference, or other organization with authority over varsity
intercollegiate athletics located within this state, including athletics
coaching staff, shall not be liable for any damages related to an subject to
liability to a person or an entity as a result of:
(1) An intercollegiate student-athlete's ability or inability to
earn compensation for the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or
likeness resulting from decisions and actions routinely taken within the
course of their employment in related to intercollegiate athletics;
(2) The adoption of, agreement to, enforcement of, or compliance
with any rule or bylaw of an association or conference that does not violate
this subchapter limiting or prohibiting a student-athlete from receiving
compensation from an association, conference, institution, or other person or
entity;
03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247

HB1917
(3) Restricting or curtailing the eligibility for an
intercollegiate athletics competition of a student-athlete who violates this
subchapter or a rule of the institution of higher education, association, or
conference implementing the requirements of this subchapter; or
(4) Complying with an agreement, understanding, rule, or bylaw
adopted by an institution of higher education, conference, or association or
a combination of conferences or institutions of higher education that is
otherwise reasonably contemplated under this subchapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1308, concerning the civil remedies
available under the Arkansas Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act, is amended
to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) This subchapter does not waive any immunity or statutory
protection available to or constitutional autonomy of an institution of
higher education located within the state or an officer, agent, or employee
of the institution of higher education.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-62-803 is amended to read as follows:
6-62-803. Limits on funding.
(a) For the certification required under § 6-62-805, the amount
allowed to be budgeted of unrestricted educational and general funds for
intercollegiate athletic programs at a state-supported institutions
institution of higher education shall be limited to an amount established:
(1) Established by the Division of Higher Education for the
fiscal year 2012-2013; or an
(2) An amount of not more than two percent (2%) four percent
(4%) of the actual total unrestricted educational and general revenues of the
previous fiscal year at institutions the state-supported institution of
higher education.
(b) The division shall annually adjust the allowable transfer based
upon the Consumer Price Index.
(c) This section shall not apply to expenditures:
(1) An expenditure related to compliance with § 6-60-111 or
increased compliance under 20 U.S.C. § 1092(f), nor the;
(2) The transfer of funds necessary to support women's athletic
programs; or
03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247

HB1917
(3) The transfer of funds necessary to:
(A) Comply with federal regulations affecting athletics
programs; or
(B) Make up shortfalls in anticipated revenues due to
third-party litigation settlements affecting athletics programs.

SECTION 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1303(e) of Section 1
of this act is effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.




























03/31/2025 9:37:53 AM CRH247